src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/pl.aff
SFX H             dli my    a  
SFX H             d y my    a  
SFX H             dli cie   a  
SFX H             d y cie   a  
SFX H             dli       a  
SFX H             d y       a  
SFX H             d bym     a  
SFX H             d abym    a  
SFX H             d by      a  
SFX H             d aby     a  
SFX H             d by      a  
SFX H             d aby     a  
SFX H             d oby     a  
SFX H             dliby     a  
SFX H             d yby     a  
SFX H             dliby cie a  
SFX H             d yby cie a  
SFX H             dliby my  a  
SFX H             d yby my  a  
SFX H             ad em     [^z]   
SFX H             ad am     [^z]   
SFX H             ad e      [^z]   
SFX H             ad a      [^z]   
SFX H             ad        [^z]   
SFX H             ad a      [^z]   
SFX H             ad o      [^z]   
SFX H             edli my   [^z]   
SFX H             ad y my   [^z]   
SFX H             edli cie  [^z]   
SFX H             ad y cie  [^z]   
SFX H             edli      [^z]   
SFX H             ad y      [^z]   
SFX H             ad bym    [^z]   
SFX H             ad abym   [^z]   
SFX H             ad by     [^z]   
SFX H             ad aby    [^z]   
SFX H             ad by     [^z]   
SFX H             ad aby    [^z]   
SFX H             ad oby    [^z]   
SFX H             edliby    [^z]   
SFX H             ad yby    [^z]   
SFX H             edliby cie [^z]   
SFX H             ad yby cie [^z]   
SFX H             edliby my [^z]   
SFX H             ad yby my [^z]   
SFX H              d em     z   
SFX H              d am     z   
SFX H              d e      z   
SFX H              d a      z   
SFX H              d        z   
SFX H              d a      z   
SFX H              d o      z   
SFX H              dli my   z   
SFX H              d y my   z   
SFX H              dli cie  z   
SFX H              d y cie  z   
SFX H              dli      z   
SFX H              d y      z   
SFX H              d bym    z   
SFX H              d abym   z   
SFX H              d by     z   
SFX H              d aby    z   
SFX H              d by     z   
SFX H              d aby    z   
SFX H              d oby    z   
SFX H              dliby    z   
SFX H              d yby    z   
SFX H              dliby cie z   
SFX H              d yby cie z   
SFX H              dliby my z   
SFX H              d yby my z   
SFX H   e         od em     [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od am     [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od e      [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od a      [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e          d        [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od a      [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od o      [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         edli my   [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od y my   [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         edli cie  [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od y cie  [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         edli      [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od y      [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e          d bym    [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od abym   [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e          d by     [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od aby    [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e          d by     [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od aby    [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od oby    [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         edliby    [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od yby    [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         edliby cie [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od yby cie [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         edliby my [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         od yby my [^mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os em     [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os am     [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os e      [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os a      [mn]ie  
SFX H   e          s        [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os a      [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os o      [mn]ie  
SFX H              li my    [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os y my   [mn]ie  
SFX H              li cie   [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os y cie  [mn]ie  
SFX H              li       [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os y      [mn]ie  
SFX H   e          s bym    [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os abym   [mn]ie  
SFX H   e          s by     [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os aby    [mn]ie  
SFX H   e          s by     [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os aby    [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os oby    [mn]ie  
SFX H              liby     [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os yby    [mn]ie  
SFX H              liby cie [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os yby cie [mn]ie  
SFX H              liby my  [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         os yby my [mn]ie  
SFX H   e         ad em     je  
SFX H   e         ad am     je  
SFX H   e         ad e      je  
SFX H   e         ad a      je  
SFX H   e         ad        je  
SFX H   e         ad a      je  
SFX H   e         ad o      je  
SFX H             dli my    je  
SFX H   e         ad y my   je  
SFX H             dli cie   je  
SFX H   e         ad y cie  je  
SFX H             dli       je  
SFX H   e         ad y      je  
SFX H   e         ad bym    je  
SFX H   e         ad abym   je  
SFX H   e         ad by     je  
SFX H   e         ad aby    je  
SFX H   e         ad by     je  
SFX H   e         ad aby    je  
SFX H   e         ad oby    je  
SFX H             dliby     je  
SFX H   e         ad yby    je  
SFX H             dliby cie je  
SFX H   e         ad yby cie je  
SFX H             dliby my  je  
SFX H   e         ad yby my je  
SFX H   e         ot em     le  
SFX H   e         ot am     le  
SFX H   e         ot e      le  
SFX H   e         ot a      le  
SFX H   e          t        le  
SFX H   e         ot a      le  
SFX H   e         ot o      le  
SFX H              li my    le  
SFX H   e         ot y my   le  
SFX H              li cie   le  
SFX H   e         ot y cie  le  
SFX H              li       le  
SFX H   e         ot y      le  
SFX H   e          t bym    le  
SFX H   e         ot abym   le  
SFX H   e          t by     le  
SFX H   e         ot aby    le  
SFX H   e          t by     le  
SFX H   e         ot aby    le  
SFX H   e         ot oby    le  
SFX H              liby     le  
SFX H   e         ot yby    le  
SFX H              liby cie le  
SFX H   e         ot yby cie le  
SFX H              liby my  le  
SFX H   e         ot yby my le  
SFX H   j         szed em   [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz am     [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szed e    [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz a      [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szed      [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz a      [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz o      [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szli my   [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz y my   [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szli cie  [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz y cie  [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szli      [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz y      [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szed bym  [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz abym   [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szed by   [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz aby    [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szed by   [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz aby    [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz oby    [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szliby    [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz yby    [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szliby cie [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz yby cie [^e]j  
SFX H   j         szliby my [^e]j  
SFX H   j         sz yby my [^e]j  
SFX H   ej        szed em   [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz am     [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed e    [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz a      [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed      [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz a      [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz o      [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szli my   [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz y my   [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szli cie  [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz y cie  [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szli      [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz y      [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed bym  [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz abym   [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed by   [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz aby    [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed by   [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz aby    [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz oby    [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szliby    [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz yby    [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szliby cie [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz yby cie [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szliby my [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        sz yby my [^bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed em   [bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed e    [bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed      [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz am     [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz a      [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz a      [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz o      [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         szli my   [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz y my   [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         szli cie  [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz y cie  [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         szli      [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz y      [bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed bym  [bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed by   [bdw]ej  
SFX H   ej        szed by   [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz abym   [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz aby    [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz aby    [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz oby    [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         szliby    [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz yby    [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         szliby cie [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz yby cie [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         szliby my [bdw]ej  
SFX H   j         sz yby my [bdw]ej  
SFX H             z em      y  
SFX H             z am      y  
SFX H             z e       y  
SFX H             z a       y  
SFX H             z         y  
SFX H             z a       y  
SFX H             z o       y  
SFX H             li my     y  
SFX H             z y my    y  
SFX H             li cie    y  
SFX H             z y cie   y  
SFX H             li        y  
SFX H             z y       y  
SFX H             z bym     y  
SFX H             z abym    y  
SFX H             z by      y  
SFX H             z aby     y  
SFX H             z by      y  
SFX H             z aby     y  
SFX H             z oby     y  
SFX H             liby      y  
SFX H             z yby     y  
SFX H             liby cie  y  
SFX H             z yby cie y  
SFX H             liby my   y  
SFX H             z yby my  y  
SFX H   e         az em     [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az am     [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az e      [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az a      [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az        [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az a      [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az o      [^i]e  
SFX H             li my     [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az y my   [^i]e  
SFX H             li cie    [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az y cie  [^i]e  
SFX H             li        [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az y      [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az bym    [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az abym   [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az by     [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az aby    [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az by     [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az aby    [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az oby    [^i]e  
SFX H             liby      [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az yby    [^i]e  
SFX H             liby cie  [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az yby cie [^i]e  
SFX H             liby my   [^i]e  
SFX H   e         az yby my [^i]e  
SFX H   e         oz em     ie  
SFX H   e         oz am     ie  
SFX H   e         oz e      ie  
SFX H   e         oz a      ie  
SFX H   e          z        ie  
SFX H   e         oz a      ie  
SFX H   e         oz o      ie  
SFX H             li my     ie  
SFX H   e         oz y my   ie  
SFX H             li cie    ie  
SFX H   e         oz y cie  ie  
SFX H             li        ie  
SFX H   e         oz y      ie  
SFX H   e          z bym    ie  
SFX H   e         oz abym   ie  
SFX H   e          z by     ie  
SFX H   e         oz aby    ie  
SFX H   e          z by     ie  
SFX H   e         oz aby    ie  
SFX H   e         oz oby    ie  
SFX H             liby      ie  
SFX H   e         oz yby    ie  
SFX H             liby cie  ie  
SFX H   e         oz yby cie ie  
SFX H             liby my   ie  
SFX H   e         oz yby my ie  
SFX H   e         a em      [^rz]e 
SFX H   e         a am      [^rz]e 
SFX H   e         a e       [^rz]e 
SFX H   e         a a       [^rz]e 
SFX H   e         a         [^rz]e 
SFX H   e         a a       [^rz]e 
SFX H   e         a o       [^rz]e 
SFX H             li my     [^rz]e 
SFX H   e         a y my    [^rz]e 
